Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.150

Action against commission enforced as if a corporation—Liability—Limitations.

Any action by the commission administrator, member, employee, or agent thereof pertaining to the performance or nonperformance or misperformance of any matters or things authorized, required, or permitted by this chapter, and any other liabilities, debts, or claims against the commission shall be enforced in the same manner as if the commission were a corporation. No liability for the debts or actions of the commission shall exist against the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof. Liability for the debts or actions of the commission's administrator, member, employee, or agent incurred in their official capacity under this chapter does not exist either against the administrator, members, employees, and agents in their individual capacity or the state of Washington. The administrator, its members, and its agents and employees are not responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.

All persons employed or contracting under this chapter shall be limited to, and all salaries, expenses, and liabilities incurred by the commission shall be payable only from the funds collected under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 396 s 32; 2002 c 313 s 102; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.150. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 7; RRS s 6266-7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.